Illinois, session 104th, HB3791.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as Dax's Law. 5    Section 5. The Humane Care for Animals Act is amended by 6changing Section 4.04 as follows: 7    (510 ILCS 70/4.04)  (from Ch. 8, par. 704.04)8    Sec. 4.04. Injuring or killing police animals, service 9animals, accelerant detection dogs, or search and rescue dogs 10being used for law enforcement purposes prohibited. 11    (a) It shall be unlawful for any person to willfully or 12maliciously torture, mutilate, injure, disable, poison, or 13kill (i) any animal used by a law enforcement department or 14agency in the performance of the functions or duties of the 15department or agency or when placed in confinement off duty, 16(ii) any service animal, (iii) any search and rescue dog being 17used for law enforcement purposes, (iii) (iv) any law 18enforcement, service, or search and rescue animal in training, 19or (iv) (v) any accelerant detection canine used by a fire 20investigator or law enforcement officer for arson 21investigations in the performance of his or her functions or 22while off duty. However, a police officer or veterinarian may   HB3791- 2 -LRB104 11864 JDS 21954 b1perform euthanasia in emergency situations when delay would 2cause the animal undue suffering and pain.3    (b) A person convicted of violating of subsection (a) of 4this Section is guilty of a Class 4 felony if the animal is not 5killed or totally disabled; if the animal is killed or totally 6disabled, the person is guilty of a Class 3 felony.7    (c) If the offender is convicted of violating subsection 8(a), the offender shall be responsible for any veterinarian 9bills for an animal that was injured, and the purchase and 10training costs for another animal, if the animal injured or 11killed is no longer able to be in service.12    (d) A person does not violate subsection (a) if the animal 13used by a law enforcement department or agency was used 14against the person in violation of the law enforcement 15department or agency's use of force continuum or policy. 16(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07; 95-560, eff. 8-30-07; 1796-1171, eff. 7-22-10.)